Utah statutes.
59-12-112.   Tax a lien when selling business -- Liability of purchaser.
The tax imposed by this chapter shall be a lien upon the property of any
person who sells out his business or stock of goods or quits business.  Such
person shall complete the return provided for under Section 59-12-107, within
30 days after the date he sold his business or stock of goods, or quit
business.  Such person's successor in business shall withhold  enough of the
purchase money to cover the amount of taxes due and unpaid until the former
owner produces a receipt from the commission showing that the taxes have been
paid, or a certificate that no taxes are due.  If the purchaser of a business
or stock of goods fails to withhold such purchase money and the taxes are due
and unpaid after the 30-day period allowed, he is personally liable for the
payment of the taxes collected and unpaid by the former owner.
